Hawaii statutes.
§445-33 Suit on bond. The treasurer
or, by the treasurer's written consent, any person whose property is sold by
any auctioneer, concerning which property a record has not been kept as
required by section 445-30, or concerning which the auctioneer has otherwise
failed to fulfill the terms of the auctioneer's bond, may prosecute the
auctioneer under the auctioneer's bond, and recover thereon any actual loss
caused to the treasurer or person or sum due to the treasurer or person by the
auctioneer, and also the sum of $5 to the use of the treasury for each item by
section 445-30 required to be entered in the record which is omitted therefrom,
or which is entered therein incorrectly; and the license of the auctioneer may,
in the discretion of any judge or court, be canceled. [L 1896, c 64, §29; RL
1925, §1980; RL 1935, §2427; RL 1945, §7029; RL 1955, §155-30; HRS §445-33; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next